Utah statutes.
77-23a-12.   Enjoining a violation -- Civil action by attorney general.

(1)  When it appears that a person is engaged or is about to engage in any act that constitutes or will constitute a felony violation of this chapter or is otherwise prohibited by this chapter, the attorney general may initiate a civil action in a district court of the state to enjoin the violation.

(2)  The court shall proceed as soon as practicable to the hearing and determination of the action and may at any time before final determination enter a restraining order or prohibition, or take other action as warranted to prevent a continuing and substantial injury to the state or to any person or class of persons for whose protection the action is brought.

(3)  A proceeding under this section is governed by the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure, except if an information has been filed or an indictment has been returned against the respondent, discovery is governed by the Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure.



Amended by Chapter 122, 1989 General Session

